Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.363

Off-road motorcycle.

"Off-road motorcycle" means a motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330 that is labeled by the manufacturer's statement or certificate of origin as intended for "off-road use only" or a similar message stamped into the frame of the motorcycle, contained in the owner's manual, or affixed to any part of the motorcycle.

[ 2011 c 121 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 121: "This act takes effect January 1, 2012." [ 2011 c 121 s 5.]